Florida, session 2026, HB677.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
68
69 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Freedom to Learn
70 Act."
71 Section 2. Subsection (4) of section 1000.05, Florida
72 Statutes, is amended to read:
73 1000.05 Discrimination against students and employees in
74 the Florida K-20 public education system prohibited; equality of
75 access required.—
Page 3 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
76 (4)(a) It shall constitute discrimination on the basis of
77 race, color, national origin, or sex under this section to
78 subject any student or employee to training or instruction that
79 espouses, promotes, advances, inculcates, or compels such
80 student or employee to believe any of the following concepts:
81 1. Members of one race, color, national origin, or sex are
82 morally superior to members of another race, color, national
83 origin, or sex.
84 2. A person, by virtue of his or her race, color, national
85 origin, or sex, is inherently racist, sexist, or oppressive,
86 whether consciously or unconsciously.
87 3. A person's moral character or status as either
88 privileged or oppressed is necessarily determined by his or her
89 race, color, national origin, or sex.
90 4. Members of one race, color, national origin, or sex
91 cannot and should not attempt to treat others without respect to
92 race, color, national origin, or sex.
93 5. A person, by virtue of his or her race, color, national
94 origin, or sex, bears responsibility for, or should be
95 discriminated against or receive adverse treatment because of,
96 actions committed in the past by other members of the same race,
97 color, national origin, or sex.
98 6. A person, by virtue of his or her race, color, national
99 origin, or sex, should be discriminated against or receive
100 adverse treatment to achieve diversity, equity, or inclusion.
Page 4 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
101 7. A person, by virtue of his or her race, color, sex, or
102 national origin, bears personal responsibility for and must feel
103 guilt, anguish, or other forms of psychological distress because
104 of actions, in which the person played no part, committed in the
105 past by other members of the same race, color, national origin,
106 or sex.
107 8. Such virtues as merit, excellence, hard work, fairness,
108 neutrality, objectivity, and racial colorblindness are racist or
109 sexist, or were created by members of a particular race, color,
110 national origin, or sex to oppress members of another race,
111 color, national origin, or sex.
112 (b) Paragraph (a) may not be construed to prohibit
113 discussion of the concepts listed therein as part of a larger
114 course of training or instruction, provided such training or
115 instruction is given in an objective manner without endorsement
116 of the concepts.
117 Section 3. Section 1000.071, Florida Statutes, is
118 repealed.
119 Section 4. Paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section
120 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
121 1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
122 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
123 powers and perform all duties listed below:
124 (8) STUDENT WELFARE.—
125 (c)1. In accordance with the rights of parents enumerated
Page 5 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
126 in ss. 1002.20 and 1014.04, adopt procedures for notifying a
127 student's parent if there is a change in the student's services
128 or monitoring related to the student's mental, emotional, or
129 physical health or well-being and the school's ability to
130 provide a safe and supportive learning environment for the
131 student. The procedures must reinforce the fundamental right of
132 parents to make decisions regarding the upbringing and control
133 of their children by requiring school district personnel to
134 encourage a student to discuss issues relating to his or her
135 well-being with his or her parent or to facilitate discussion of
136 the issue with the parent. The procedures may not prohibit
137 parents from accessing any of their student's education and
138 health records created, maintained, or used by the school
139 district, as required by s. 1002.22(2).
140 2. A school district may not adopt procedures or student
141 support forms that prohibit school district personnel from
142 notifying a parent about his or her student's mental, emotional,
143 or physical health or well-being, or a change in related
144 services or monitoring, or that encourage or have the effect of
145 encouraging a student to withhold from a parent such
146 information. School district personnel may not discourage or
147 prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical
148 decisions affecting a student's mental, emotional, or physical
149 health or well-being. A school district may not adopt a
150 procedure that compels or authorizes school personnel to provide
Page 6 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
151 such information to a parent if a reasonably prudent person
152 would believe that disclosure would result in harm to the
153 student, including, but not limited to, This subparagraph does
154 not prohibit a school district from adopting procedures that
155 permit school personnel to withhold such information from a
156 parent if a reasonably prudent person would believe that
157 disclosure would result in abuse, abandonment, or neglect, as
158 those terms are defined in s. 39.01.
159 3. Classroom instruction by school personnel or third
160 parties on sexual orientation or gender identity may not occur
161 in prekindergarten through grade 8, except when required by ss.
162 1003.42(2)(o)3. and 1003.46. If such instruction is provided in
163 grades 9 through 12, the instruction must be age-appropriate or
164 developmentally appropriate for students in accordance with
165 state standards. This subparagraph applies to charter schools.
166 4. Student support services training developed or provided
167 by a school district to school district personnel must adhere to
168 student services guidelines, standards, and frameworks
169 established by the Department of Education.
170 5. At the beginning of the school year, each school
171 district shall notify parents of each health care service
172 offered at their student's school and the option to withhold
173 consent or decline any specific service in accordance with s.
174 1014.06. Parental consent to a health care service does not
175 waive the parent's right to access his or her student's
Page 7 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
176 educational or health records or to be notified about a change
177 in his or her student's services or monitoring as provided by
178 this paragraph.
179 4.6. Before administering a student well-being
180 questionnaire or health screening form to a student in
181 kindergarten through grade 3, the school district must provide
182 the questionnaire or health screening form to the parent and
183 obtain the permission of the parent.
184 5.7. Each school district shall adopt procedures for a
185 parent to notify the principal, or his or her designee,
186 regarding concerns under this paragraph at his or her student's
187 school and the process for resolving those concerns within 7
188 calendar days after notification by the parent.
189 a. At a minimum, the procedures must require that within
190 30 days after notification by the parent that the concern
191 remains unresolved, the school district must either resolve the
192 concern or provide a statement of the reasons for not resolving
193 the concern.
194 b. If a concern is not resolved by the school district, a
195 parent may:
196 (I) Request the Commissioner of Education to appoint a
197 special magistrate who is a member of The Florida Bar in good
198 standing and who has at least 5 years' experience in
199 administrative law. The special magistrate shall determine facts
200 relating to the dispute over the school district procedure or
Page 8 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
201 practice, consider information provided by the school district,
202 and render a recommended decision for resolution to the State
203 Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the request
204 by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve or
205 reject the recommended decision at its next regularly scheduled
206 meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more than 30
207 days after the date the recommended decision is transmitted. The
208 costs of the special magistrate shall be borne by the school
209 district. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules,
210 including forms, necessary to implement this subparagraph.
211 (II) Bring an action against the school district to obtain
212 a declaratory judgment that the school district procedure or
213 practice violates this paragraph and seek injunctive relief. A
214 court may award damages and shall award reasonable attorney fees
215 and court costs to a parent who receives declaratory or
216 injunctive relief.
217 c. Each school district shall adopt and post on its
218 website policies to notify parents of the procedures required
219 under this subparagraph.
220 d. Nothing contained in this subparagraph shall be
221 construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in
222 equity already existing under the common law or general law.
223 Section 5. Paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section
224 1001.706, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
225 1001.706 Powers and duties of the Board of Governors.—
Page 9 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
226 (5) POWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO ACCOUNTABILITY.—
227 (a) The Legislature intends that the Board of Governors
228 shall align the missions of each constituent university with the
229 academic success of its students; the existing and emerging
230 economic development needs of the state; the national reputation
231 of its faculty and its academic and research programs; the
232 quantity of externally generated research, patents, and
233 licenses; and the strategic and accountability plans required in
234 paragraphs (b) and (c). The Board of Governors shall
235 periodically review the mission of each constituent university
236 and make updates or revisions as needed. Upon completion of a
237 review of the mission, the board shall review existing academic
238 programs for alignment with the mission. The board shall include
239 in its review a directive to each constituent university
240 regarding its programs for any curriculum that violates s.
241 1000.05 or that is based on theories that systemic racism,
242 sexism, oppression, and privilege are inherent in the
243 institutions of the United States and were created to maintain
244 social, political, and economic inequities. The mission
245 alignment and strategic plan must consider peer institutions at
246 the constituent universities. The mission alignment and
247 strategic plan must acknowledge that universities that have a
248 national and international impact have the greatest capacity to
249 promote the state's economic development through: new
250 discoveries, patents, licenses, and technologies that generate
Page 10 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
251 state businesses of global importance; research achievements
252 through external grants and contracts that are comparable to
253 nationally recognized and ranked universities; the creation of a
254 resource rich academic environment that attracts high-technology
255 business and venture capital to the state; and this generation's
256 finest minds focusing on solving the state's economic, social,
257 environmental, and legal problems in the areas of life sciences,
258 water, sustainability, energy, and health care. A nationally
259 recognized and ranked university that has a global perspective
260 and impact must be afforded the opportunity to enable and
261 protect the university's competitiveness on the global stage in
262 fair competition with other institutions of other states in the
263 highest Carnegie Classification.
264 Section 6. Subsection (5) of section 1001.92, Florida
265 Statutes, is amended to read:
266 1001.92 State University System Performance-Based
267 Incentive.—
268 (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
269 if any institution is found to have a substantiated violation of
270 s. 1000.05(4)(a), the institution shall be ineligible to receive
271 performance funding during the next fiscal year following the
272 year in which the violation is substantiated. Substantiated
273 findings are those as determined by a court of law, a standing
274 committee of the Legislature, or the Board of Governors.
275 Section 7. Paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of section
Page 11 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
276 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (w) is
277 added to that subsection, to read:
278 1003.42 Required instruction.—
279 (2) Members of the instructional staff of the public
280 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education
281 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and
282 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the
283 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy,
284 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing
285 approved methods of instruction, the following:
286 (g)1. The history of the Holocaust (1933-1945), the
287 systematic, planned annihilation of European Jews and other
288 groups by Nazi Germany, a watershed event in the history of
289 humanity, to be taught in a manner that leads to an
290 investigation of human behavior, an understanding of the
291 ramifications of prejudice, racism, and stereotyping, and an
292 examination of what it means to be a responsible and respectful
293 person, for the purposes of encouraging tolerance of diversity
294 in a pluralistic society and for nurturing and protecting
295 democratic values and institutions, including the policy,
296 definition, and historical and current examples of antisemitism,
297 as described in s. 1000.05(7) s. 1000.05(8), and the prevention
298 of antisemitism. Each school district must annually certify and
299 provide evidence to the department, in a manner prescribed by
300 the department, that the requirements of this paragraph are met.
Page 12 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
301 The department shall prepare and offer standards and curriculum
302 for the instruction required by this paragraph and may seek
303 input from the Commissioner of Education's Task Force on
304 Holocaust Education or from any state or nationally recognized
305 Holocaust educational organizations. The department may contract
306 with any state or nationally recognized Holocaust educational
307 organizations to develop training for instructional personnel
308 and grade-appropriate classroom resources to support the
309 developed curriculum.
310 2. The second week in November shall be designated as
311 "Holocaust Education Week" in this state in recognition that
312 November is the anniversary of Kristallnacht, widely recognized
313 as a precipitating event that led to the Holocaust.
314 (w) The study of LGBTQ history in Florida and the LGBTQ
315 community's contributions to the United States, which may
316 include important United States Supreme Court cases such as
317 Obergefell v. Hodges and United States v. Windsor; the Florida
318 Legislative Investigation Committee; and the tragedy at Pulse
319 Nightclub.
320
321 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards
322 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection.
323 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the
324 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is
325 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or
Page 13 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
326 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness
327 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u).
328 Section 8. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
329 1004.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
330 1004.04 Public accountability and state approval for
331 teacher preparation programs.—
332 (2) UNIFORM CORE CURRICULA AND CANDIDATE ASSESSMENT.—
333 (e) Teacher preparation program courses:
334 1. May not distort significant historical events or
335 include a curriculum or instruction that teaches identity
336 politics, violates s. 1000.05, or is based on theories that
337 systemic racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege are inherent
338 in the institutions of the United States and were created to
339 maintain social, political, and economic inequities.
340 2. Must afford candidates the opportunity to think
341 critically, achieve mastery of academic program content, learn
342 instructional strategies, and demonstrate competence.
343 Section 9. Subsection (4) of section 1004.06, Florida
344 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (3), and subsections (2)
345 and (3) of that section are amended to read:
346 1004.06 Prohibited expenditures.—
347 (2) A Florida College System institution, state
348 university, Florida College System institution direct-support
349 organization, or state university direct-support organization
350 may, and is encouraged to, develop programs and campus
Page 14 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
351 activities anchored in the principles of diversity, equity, and
352 inclusion. Programs and campus activities may not expend any
353 state or federal funds to promote, support, or maintain any such
354 programs or campus activities that:
355 (a) Violate s. 1000.05; or
356 (b) Advocate for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or
357 promote or engage in political or social activism, as defined by
358 rules of the State Board of Education and regulations of the
359 Board of Governors.
360
361 Student fees to support student-led organizations are permitted
362 notwithstanding any speech or expressive activity by such
363 organizations which would otherwise violate this subsection,
364 provided that the public funds must be allocated to student-led
365 organizations pursuant to written policies or regulations of
366 each Florida College System institution or state university, as
367 applicable. Use of institution facilities by student-led
368 organizations is permitted notwithstanding any speech or
369 expressive activity by such organizations which would otherwise
370 violate this subsection, provided that such use must be granted
371 to student-led organizations pursuant to written policies or
372 regulations of each Florida College System institution or state
373 university, as applicable.
374 (3) Subsection (2) does not prohibit programs, campus
375 activities, or functions required for compliance with general or
Page 15 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
376 federal laws or regulations; for obtaining or retaining
377 institutional or discipline-specific accreditation with the
378 approval of either the State Board of Education or the Board of
379 Governors; or for access programs for military veterans, Pell
380 Grant recipients, first generation college students,
381 nontraditional students, "2+2" transfer students from the
382 Florida College System, students from low-income families, or
383 students with unique abilities.
384 Section 10. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
385 1004.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
386 1004.85 Postsecondary educator preparation institutes.—
387 (2)(a) Postsecondary institutions that are accredited or
388 approved as described in State Board of Education rule may seek
389 approval from the Department of Education to create educator
390 preparation institutes for the purpose of providing any or all
391 of the following:
392 1. Professional learning instruction to assist teachers in
393 improving classroom instruction and in meeting certification or
394 recertification requirements.
395 2. Instruction to assist potential and existing substitute
396 teachers in performing their duties.
397 3. Instruction to assist paraprofessionals in meeting
398 education and training requirements.
399 4. Instruction for baccalaureate degree holders to become
400 certified teachers as provided in this section in order to
Page 16 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
401 increase routes to the classroom for professionals who hold a
402 baccalaureate degree and college graduates who were not
403 education majors.
404 5. Instruction and professional learning for part-time and
405 full-time nondegreed teachers of career programs under s.
406 1012.39(1)(c).
407 6. Instruction that does not distort significant
408 historical events or include a curriculum or instruction that
409 teaches identity politics, violates s. 1000.05, or is based on
410 theories that systemic racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege
411 are inherent in the institutions of the United States and were
412 created to maintain social, political, and economic inequities.
413 Courses and instruction within the educator preparation
414 institute must afford candidates the opportunity to think
415 critically, achieve mastery of academic program content, learn
416 instructional strategies, and demonstrate competence.
417 Section 11. Paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (2) of
418 section 1006.28, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
419 1006.28 Duties of district school board, district school
420 superintendent; and school principal regarding K-12
421 instructional materials.—
422 (2) DISTRICT SCHOOL BOARD.—The district school board has
423 the constitutional duty and responsibility to select and provide
424 adequate instructional materials for all students in accordance
425 with the requirements of this part. The district school board
Page 17 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
426 also has the following specific duties and responsibilities:
427 (a) Courses of study; adoption.—Adopt courses of study,
428 including instructional materials, for use in the schools of the
429 district.
430 1. Each district school board is responsible for the
431 content of all instructional materials and any other materials
432 used in a classroom, made available in a school or classroom
433 library, or included on a reading list, whether adopted and
434 purchased from the state-adopted instructional materials list,
435 adopted and purchased through a district instructional materials
436 program under s. 1006.283, or otherwise purchased or made
437 available.
438 2. Each district school board must adopt a policy
439 regarding an objection by a parent or a resident of the county
440 to the use of a specific material, which clearly describes a
441 process to handle all objections and provides for resolution.
442 The objection form, as prescribed by State Board of Education
443 rule, and the district school board's process must be easy to
444 read and understand and be easily accessible on the homepage of
445 the school district's website. The objection form must also
446 identify the school district point of contact and contact
447 information for the submission of an objection. The process must
448 provide the parent or resident the opportunity to proffer
449 evidence to the district school board that:
450 a. An instructional material does not meet the criteria of
Page 18 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
451 s. 1006.31(2) or s. 1006.40(3)(c) if it was selected for use in
452 a course or otherwise made available to students in the school
453 district but was not subject to the public notice, review,
454 comment, and hearing procedures under s. 1006.283(2)(b)8., 9.,
455 and 11.
456 b. Any material used in a classroom, made available in a
457 school or classroom library, or included on a reading list
458 contains content which:
459 (I) Is pornographic or prohibited under s. 847.012;
460 (II) Depicts or describes sexual conduct as defined in s.
461 847.001(19), unless such material is for a course required by s.
462 1003.46 or s. 1003.42(2)(o)1.g. or 3., or identified by State
463 Board of Education rule;
464 (III) Is not suited to student needs and their ability to
465 comprehend the material presented; or
466 (III)(IV) Is inappropriate for the grade level and age
467 group for which the material is used.
468
469 A resident of the county who is not the parent or guardian of a
470 student with access to school district materials may not object
471 to more than one material per month. The State Board of
472 Education may adopt rules to implement this provision. Any
473 material that is subject to an objection on the basis of sub-
474 sub-subparagraph b.(I) or sub-sub-subparagraph b.(II) must be
475 removed within 5 school days after receipt of the objection and
Page 19 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
476 remain unavailable to students of that school until the
477 objection is resolved. Parents shall have the right to read
478 passages from any material that is subject to an objection. If
479 the school board denies a parent the right to read passages due
480 to content that meets the requirements under sub-sub-
481 subparagraph b.(I), the school district shall discontinue the
482 use of the material in the school district. If the district
483 school board finds that any material meets the requirements
484 under sub-subparagraph a. or that any other material contains
485 prohibited content under sub-sub-subparagraph b.(I), the school
486 district shall discontinue use of the material. If the district
487 school board finds that any other material contains prohibited
488 content under sub-sub-subparagraphs b.(II)-(IV), the school
489 district shall discontinue use of the material for any grade
490 level or age group for which such use is inappropriate or
491 unsuitable.
492 3. Each district school board must establish a process by
493 which the parent of a public school student or a resident of the
494 county may contest the district school board's adoption of a
495 specific instructional material. The parent or resident must
496 file a petition, on a form provided by the school board, within
497 30 calendar days after the adoption of the instructional
498 material by the school board. The school board must make the
499 form available to the public and publish the form on the school
500 district's website. The form must be signed by the parent or
Page 20 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
501 resident, include the required contact information, and state
502 the objection to the instructional material based on the
503 criteria of s. 1006.31(2) or s. 1006.40(3)(c). Within 30 days
504 after the 30-day period has expired, the school board must, for
505 all petitions timely received, conduct at least one open public
506 hearing before an unbiased and qualified hearing officer. The
507 hearing officer may not be an employee or agent of the school
508 district. The hearing is not subject to the provisions of
509 chapter 120; however, the hearing must provide sufficient
510 procedural protections to allow each petitioner an adequate and
511 fair opportunity to be heard and present evidence to the hearing
512 officer. The school board's decision after convening a hearing
513 is final and not subject to further petition or review.
514 4. Meetings of committees convened for the purpose of
515 ranking, eliminating, or selecting instructional materials for
516 recommendation to the district school board must be noticed and
517 open to the public in accordance with s. 286.011. Any committees
518 convened for such purposes must include parents of students who
519 will have access to such materials.
520 5. Meetings of committees convened for the purpose of
521 resolving an objection by a parent or resident to specific
522 materials must be noticed and open to the public in accordance
523 with s. 286.011. Any committees convened for such purposes must
524 include parents of students who will have access to such
525 materials.
Page 21 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
526 6. If a parent disagrees with the determination made by
527 the district school board on the objection to the use of a
528 specific material, a parent may request the Commissioner of
529 Education to appoint a special magistrate who is a member of The
530 Florida Bar in good standing and who has at least 5 years'
531 experience in administrative law. The special magistrate shall
532 determine facts relating to the school district's determination,
533 consider information provided by the parent and the school
534 district, and render a recommended decision for resolution to
535 the State Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the
536 request by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve
537 or reject the recommended decision at its next regularly
538 scheduled meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more
539 than 30 days after the date the recommended decision is
540 transmitted. The costs of the special magistrate shall be borne
541 by the school district. The State Board of Education shall adopt
542 rules, including forms, necessary to implement this
543 subparagraph.
544 (d) School library media services; establishment and
545 maintenance.—Establish and maintain a program of school library
546 media services for all public schools in the district, including
547 school library media centers, or school library media centers
548 open to the public, and, in addition such traveling or
549 circulating libraries as may be needed for the proper operation
550 of the district school system. School librarians, media
Page 22 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
551 specialists, and other personnel involved in the selection of
552 school district library materials must complete the training
553 program developed pursuant to s. 1006.29(6) before reviewing and
554 selecting age-appropriate materials and library resources. Upon
555 written request, a school district shall provide access to any
556 material or book specified in the request that is maintained in
557 a district school system library and is available for review.
558 1. Each book made available to students through a school
559 district library media center or included in a recommended or
560 assigned school or grade-level reading list must be selected by
561 a school district employee who holds a valid educational media
562 specialist certificate, regardless of whether the book is
563 purchased, donated, or otherwise made available to students.
564 2. Each district school board shall adopt procedures for
565 developing library media center collections and post the
566 procedures on the website for each school within the district.
567 School libraries may provide materials and information
568 presenting all points of view on current and historical issues.
569 Materials may not be proscribed or removed because of partisan
570 or doctrinal disapproval. The procedures must:
571 a. Require that book selections meet the criteria in s.
572 1006.40(3)(c).
573 b. Require consultation of reputable, professionally
574 recognized reviewing periodicals and school community
575 stakeholders.
Page 23 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
576 c. Provide for library media center collections, including
577 classroom libraries, based on reader interest, support of state
578 academic standards and aligned curriculum, and the academic
579 needs of students and faculty.
580 d. Provide for the regular removal or discontinuance of
581 books based on, at a minimum, physical condition, rate of recent
582 circulation, alignment to state academic standards and relevancy
583 to curriculum, out-of-date content, and required removal
584 pursuant to subparagraph (a)2.
585 3. Each elementary school must publish on its website, in
586 a searchable format prescribed by the department, a list of all
587 materials maintained and accessible in the school library media
588 center or a classroom library or required as part of a school or
589 grade-level reading list.
590 4. Each district school board shall adopt and publish on
591 its website the process for a parent to limit his or her
592 student's access to materials in the school or classroom
593 library.
594 Section 12. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
595 1007.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
596 1007.25 General education courses; common prerequisites;
597 other degree requirements.—
598 (3) The chair of the State Board of Education and the
599 chair of the Board of Governors, or their designees, shall
600 jointly appoint faculty committees to review and recommend to
Page 24 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
601 the Articulation Coordinating Committee for approval by the
602 State Board of Education and the Board of Governors statewide
603 general education core course options for inclusion in the
604 statewide course numbering system established under s. 1007.24.
605 Faculty committees shall, by July 1, 2024, and by July 1 every 4
606 years thereafter, review and submit recommendations to the
607 Articulation Coordinating Committee and the commissioner for the
608 removal, alignment, realignment, or addition of general
609 education core courses that satisfy the requirements of this
610 subsection.
611 (c) General education core courses may not distort
612 significant historical events or include a curriculum that
613 teaches identity politics, violates s. 1000.05, or is based on
614 theories that systemic racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege
615 are inherent in the institutions of the United States and were
616 created to maintain social, political, and economic inequities.
617 Section 13. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
618 1012.551, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
619 1012.551 Teacher preparation core principles, standards,
620 and content.—
621 (2) The uniform core curricula for each state-approved
622 teacher preparation program must meet, at a minimum, the
623 following standards:
624 (a) May not distort significant historical events or
625 include curriculum or instruction that teaches identity
Page 25 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
626 politics, violates s. 1000.05, or is based on theories that
627 systemic racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege are inherent
628 in the institutions of the United States and were created to
629 maintain social, political, and economic inequities.
630 Section 14. Paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section
631 1012.56, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (b), and
632 paragraph (a) of subsection (7) and present paragraph (b) of
633 subsection (8) of that section are amended to read:
634 1012.56 Educator certification requirements.—
635 (7) TYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.—
636 (a) The Department of Education shall issue a professional
637 certificate for a period not to exceed 5 years to any applicant
638 who fulfills one of the following:
639 1. Meets all the applicable requirements outlined in
640 subsection (2).
641 2. For a professional certificate covering grades 6
642 through 12:
643 a. Meets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a)-
644 (h).
645 b. Holds a master's or higher degree in the area of
646 science, technology, engineering, or mathematics.
647 c. Teaches a high school course in the subject of the
648 advanced degree.
649 d. Is rated highly effective as determined by the
650 teacher's performance evaluation under s. 1012.34, based in part
Page 26 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
651 on student performance as measured by a statewide, standardized
652 assessment or an Advanced Placement, Advanced International
653 Certificate of Education, or International Baccalaureate
654 examination.
655 e. Achieves a passing score on the Florida professional
656 education competency examination required by state board rule.
657 3. Meets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a)-
658 (h) and completes a professional learning certification program
659 approved by the department pursuant to paragraph (8)(b) (8)(c)
660 or an educator preparation institute approved by the department
661 pursuant to s. 1004.85. An applicant who completes one of these
662 programs and is rated highly effective as determined by his or
663 her performance evaluation under s. 1012.34 is not required to
664 take or achieve a passing score on the professional education
665 competency examination in order to be awarded a professional
666 certificate.
667
668 At least 1 year before an individual's temporary certificate is
669 set to expire, the department shall electronically notify the
670 individual of the date on which his or her certificate will
671 expire and provide a list of each method by which the
672 qualifications for a professional certificate can be completed.
673 (8) PROFESSIONAL LEARNING CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.—
674 (b) Professional learning certification program courses:
675 1. May not distort significant historical events or
Page 27 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
676 include curriculum or instruction that teaches identity
677 politics, violates s. 1000.05, or is based on theories that
678 systemic racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege are inherent
679 in the institutions of the United States and were created to
680 maintain social, political, and economic inequities.
681 2. Must afford candidates the opportunity to think
682 critically, achieve mastery of academic program content, learn
683 instructional strategies, and demonstrate competence.
684 Section 15. Subsection (4) of section 1012.562, Florida
685 Statutes, is amended to read:
686 1012.562 Public accountability and state approval of
687 school leader preparation programs.—The Department of Education
688 shall establish a process for the approval of Level I and Level
689 II school leader preparation programs that will enable aspiring
690 school leaders to obtain their certificates in educational
691 leadership under s. 1012.56. School leader preparation programs
692 must be competency-based, aligned to the principal leadership
693 standards adopted by the state board, and open to individuals
694 employed by public schools, including charter schools and
695 virtual schools. Level I programs lead to initial certification
696 in educational leadership for the purpose of preparing
697 individuals to serve as school administrators. Level II programs
698 build upon Level I training and lead to renewal certification as
699 a school principal.
700 (4) PROGRAM PROHIBITIONS; REQUIREMENTS.—
Page 28 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 677 2026
701 (a) School leader preparation programs may not distort
702 significant historical events or include curriculum or
703 instruction that teaches identity politics, violates s. 1000.05,
704 or is based on theories that systemic racism, sexism,
705 oppression, and privilege are inherent in the institutions of
706 the United States and were created to maintain social,
707 political, and economic inequities.
708 (b) School leader preparation programs must afford
709 candidates the opportunity to demonstrate mastery of program
710 content, including instructional leadership strategies, coaching
711 development, school safety, and continuous improvement efforts.
712 Section 16. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 29 of 29
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb677-00